Utah statutes.
7-18a-204.   Filing of amendments to articles of incorporation.

(1)  If a foreign depository institution authorized by this state to transact business in this state through an agency, branch, or representative office amends its articles of incorporation, the institution shall file with the department a copy and an accurate English translation of the amendment authenticated by the appropriate officer of the chartering country.

(2)  Without obtaining an amended certificate of authority  under Section 7-18a-205, the filing of the amendment may not:

(a)  enlarge or alter the purpose for which the foreign depository institution is authorized to transact business in this state;

(b)  authorize the foreign depository institution to transact business in this state under any name other than the name set forth in the certificate of authority issued by the department; or

(c)  extend the duration of the foreign depository institution's corporate existence.

